North Dakota statutes. TITLE 6 Banks and Banking
CHAPTER 6-01 Department of Financial Institutions
6-01-10.
Commissioner to keep records and make reports — Biennial report.

The assistant commissioner shall act as secretary and keep all proper records and files pertaining to the duties and work of the department of financial institutions and the proceedings of the board. The commissioner shall report to the board annually, touching on all the commissioner’s official acts and those of the deputy examiners, giving abstracts of statistics and of the conditions of the various institutions to which the commissioner’s duties relate, and making such recommendations and suggestions as the commissioner may determine proper.

The state banking board shall submit a biennial report to the governor and the secretary of state in accordance with section 54-06-04. In addition to any requirements established pursuant to section 54-06-04, the banking board’s report must include a summary or abstract of the reports of the commissioner.

The commissioner shall report to the state credit union board annually in the same manner as this section provides for the commissioner’s report to the state banking board. The state credit union board shall submit a biennial report to the governor and the secretary of state in accordance with section 54-06-04, and in addition, the credit union board’s report must include a summary or abstract of the reports of the commissioner.

The biennial reports of the state banking board and the state credit union board shall be published in the form of a combined biennial report of the department of financial institutions. The biennial report of the department shall be submitted to the governor and the secretary of state in accordance with section 54-06-04. The biennial report of the department must include all other biennial reports which the commissioner or the boards are required by law to submit to the governor and the office of management and budget.

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 4635; S.L. 1911, ch. 55, § 1, subs. 5; C.L. 1913, § 5146, subs. 5; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 2, subs. b; 1933, ch. 71, § 6; 1943, ch. 91, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 6-0110; S.L. 1963, ch. 346, § 12; 1973, ch. 403, § 7; 1975, ch. 466, § 7; 1979, ch. 118, § 1; 1995, ch. 350, § 5; 2001, ch. 88, § 7; 2013, ch. 77, § 8.

6-01-11.
Salary of commissioner.

The salary of the commissioner must be within the amount appropriated for salaries by the legislative assembly. The commissioner is allowed, in addition to the commissioner’s salary, the commissioner’s necessary and actual expenses incurred in the discharge of the commissioner’s official duties. The commissioner’s salary and expenses must be audited and paid in the manner in which the salary and expenses of other state officers are paid.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 95, § 10; R.C. 1895, § 145; R.C. 1899, § 145; S.L. 1901, ch. 170, § 3; 1905, ch. 170, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 150; S.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 234; S.L. 1927, ch. 259, § 1; 1933, ch. 71, § 8; 1933, ch. 196, § 1; 1943, ch. 91, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 6-0111; S.L. 1949, ch. 314, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 6-0111; S.L. 1981, ch. 535, § 1.

6-01-12.
Bonds of commissioner and deputies. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 113, § 24.

6-01-13.
Commissioner — Appointment of assistant commissioner and assignment of titles within the department.

The commissioner may appoint, remove, and assign appropriate titles to such deputy examiners and such other employees as in the commissioner’s judgment may be necessary for the proper discharge of the business of the department of financial institutions. The commissioner may select and designate one of said deputy examiners to be the assistant commissioner to act during the absence or disability of the commissioner, and in such cases the assistant commissioner so designated has charge of the office and shall administer its affairs. The assistant commissioner shall perform such duties as may be prescribed by the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 95, § 10; R.C. 1895, § 145; R.C. 1899, § 145; S.L. 1901, ch. 170, § 3; 1905, ch. 165, § 1; 1905, ch. 170, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 150, 4635; S.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 1; 1911, ch. 55, § 1, subs. 6; C.L. 1913, §§ 234, 5146, subs. 6; S.L. 1917, ch. 219, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 5146, subs. 6; S.L. 1927, ch. 259, § 1; 1931, ch. 96, § 3, subs. a; 1933, ch. 71, § 10; 1943, ch. 91, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 6-0113; S.L. 1969, ch. 99, § 1; 2001, ch. 88, § 8; 2013, ch. 77, § 9.

6-01-14.
Deputies controlled by commissioner — Reports.

Each deputy examiner provided for in this title is under the direct orders and instructions of the commissioner, and shall report to the commissioner during or immediately after the completion of each examination of each financial corporation, financial institution, or credit union examined by the deputy examiner, together with such recommendations and suggestions as the deputy examiner may deem advisable. Such report must be in such form as may be prescribed by the commissioner, the state banking board, or state credit union board.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 95, § 10; R.C. 1895, § 145; R.C. 1899, § 145; S.L. 1901, ch. 170, § 3; 1905, ch. 165, § 1; 1905, ch. 170, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 150, 4635; S.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 1; 1911, ch. 55, § 1, subs. 8; C.L. 1913, §§ 234, 5146, subs. 8; S.L. 1917, ch. 219, § 1; 1927, ch. 259, § 1; 1931, ch. 96, § 3, subs. b; 1933, ch. 71, § 11; R.C. 1943, § 6-0114; 2013, ch. 77, § 10.

6-01-15.
Officers and employees to be disinterested.

No officer or employee of this department may have any interest, directly or indirectly, in any financial corporation or financial institution within the jurisdiction of the department of financial institutions, nor in any corporation or institution engaged wholly or in part in the writing or issuing of bonds of or for any such corporation or institution or any officer or employee thereof. Provided, however, this prohibition does not apply to membership in a state-chartered credit union or savings and loan association.

For purposes of this section, “interest” means ownership of or investment in such corporations or institutions.

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 4635; S.L. 1911, ch. 55, § 1, subs. 7; C.L. 1913, § 5146, subs. 7; S.L. 1917, ch. 219, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 5146, subs. 7; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 3, subs. c; 1933, ch. 71, § 12; R.C. 1943, § 6-0115; S.L. 1979, ch. 119, § 1; 2001, ch. 88, § 9; 2013, ch. 77, § 11.

6-01-16.
Salaries of commissioner’s deputies.

The salary of the assistant commissioner and the salary of each other deputy must be fixed by the commissioner within the limits of the legislative appropriation for such salaries. In addition to the amounts herein specified, each deputy must be allowed the deputy’s actual and necessary traveling expenses when engaged in the discharge of the deputy’s duties. The salaries of all clerks, stenographers, and other assistants must be fixed by the commissioner within the limits of the legislative appropriation therefor.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 95, § 10; R.C. 1895, § 145; R.C. 1899, § 145; S.L. 1901, ch. 170, § 3; 1905, ch. 165, § 1; 1905, ch. 170, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 150, 4635; S.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 1; 1911, ch. 55, § 1, subs. 9; C.L. 1913, §§ 234, 5146, subs. 9; S.L. 1917, ch. 219, § 3; 1925 Supp., § 5146, subs. 10; S.L. 1927, ch. 259, § 2; 1931, ch. 96, § 3, subs. d; 1933, ch. 71, § 13; 1943, ch. 91, § 7; R.C. 1943, § 6-0116; S.L. 1945, ch. 264, § 2; 1949, ch. 314, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 6-0116; 2013, ch. 77, § 12.

6-01-17.
Semiannual assessments of banks and interstate branches.

Every state banking association and banking institution under the jurisdiction and control of the commissioner and the commissioner’s deputy examiners by this title, including the Bank of North Dakota and every branch of an out-of-state state bank, shall pay a semiannual assessment. This assessment is to be determined by the state banking board as necessary to fund that portion of the department’s budget relating to the regulation of state-chartered banks and branches of out-of-state state banks, including the authority to enter cooperative fee sharing agreements and assessment of associated travel costs with other state bank supervisors. Fees for the examination of a trust department must be computed in accordance with section 6-05-28. The assessment must be paid to the department of financial institutions within thirty days of each June thirtieth and December thirty-first. If any such corporation or institution or branch is delinquent more than twenty days in making such payment, the board may seek other administrative remedies of such delinquent corporation, institution, or branch until payment of the amount due. The commissioner may assess a penalty of one percent of the outstanding assessment fee for each day that the assessment fee is delinquent. All fees and penalties under this section must be deposited with the state treasurer and deposited in the financial institutions regulatory fund.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 29; 1893, ch. 27, § 29; R.C. 1895, § 3254; S.L. 1897, ch. 31; R.C. 1899, § 3254; S.L. 1901, ch. 94, § 1; 1905, ch. 165, § 30; R.C. 1905, § 4664; S.L. 1911, ch. 55, § 4; S.L. 1915, ch. 55, § 4; C.L. 1913, § 5179; S.L. 1915, ch. 55, § 1; 1921, ch. 22, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 5179; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 4; 1943, ch. 88, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 6-0117; S.L. 1953, ch. 94, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 6-0117; S.L. 1965, ch. 82, § 1; 1967, ch. 82, § 1; 1971, ch. 102, § 1; 1979, ch. 120, § 1; 1983, ch. 110, § 1; 1987, ch. 10, § 4; 1987, ch. 120, § 2; 1989, ch. 96, § 2; 1995, ch. 79, § 3; 2011, ch. 75, § 1; 2021, ch. 76, § 4, effective April 13, 2021.

6-01-17.1.
Application fees — Cost of transcript.

The following fees must accompany an application presented to the state banking board, state credit union board, or commissioner and must be paid by the commissioner into the financial institutions regulatory fund:

For a certificate of authority to organize a banking association, a fee of five thousand dollars, paid by the applicants.

A banking association’s application for authority to remove its business to some place within the state other than the town in which it is presently located and to change its name, a fee of two thousand five hundred dollars.

National bank conversion to a state bank, a fee of two thousand five hundred dollars.

Application by two or more banks to merge or consolidate, a fee of one thousand five hundred dollars.

Application by a person to sell, dispose, or purchase an association, banking institution, or holding company, a fee of five hundred dollars unless a hearing is held before the board in which case the fee is two thousand dollars.

A banking association’s application to establish and operate a separate facility, a fee of one thousand five hundred dollars. A banking institution that discontinues a facility established for the purpose of providing educational opportunities to a high school is entitled to a refund of any application fee paid.

A banking association’s application to establish customer electronic funds transfer centers, a fee not to exceed five hundred dollars.

For a certificate of authority to organize an annuity, safe deposit, surety, or trust company, a fee of five thousand dollars.

A banking association’s application for authority to exercise trust powers, a fee of one thousand five hundred dollars.

Application to organize a credit union, a fee of three hundred dollars, paid by the applicants.

Application for a credit union to establish a branch, a fee of three hundred dollars.

Application by a credit union to expand its field of membership, a fee of one hundred fifty dollars.

Application by a federal credit union to convert to a state credit union, a fee of three hundred dollars.

For a certificate of authority to organize a savings and loan association, a fee of five thousand dollars.

A savings and loan association’s application to establish and operate a branch office, a fee of one thousand five hundred dollars.

A trust company’s application or notification to establish an operating subsidiary or branch office, a fee of five hundred dollars.

Application by two or more credit unions to merge, a fee of three hundred dollars.

The commissioner may cause a certified transcript to be prepared for any hearing conducted on an application. The costs for the original and up to six copies of the transcript must be paid by the applicant.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 121, § 1; 1989, ch. 96, § 3; 1991, ch. 81, § 2; 1995, ch. 79, § 4; 1995, ch. 80, § 1; 2001, ch. 168, § 1; 2005, ch. 86, § 2.

6-01-17.2.
Additional assessment of banks and interstate branches.

If the commissioner determines that more than one visit, inspection, or examination is necessary to promote the safety and soundness of a state banking association or a branch of an out-of-state state bank during a twelve-month period, the state banking association or branch shall pay to the state treasurer a fee for the time used by the commissioner or other person designated by the commissioner in supervising, filing, and corresponding in connection with each additional visit, inspection, or examination and report of examination and for time used by each deputy examiner, or other person in making and otherwise preparing and typing the reports of examination herein provided for. Fees for the visit, inspection, or examination must be charged by the department of financial institutions at an hourly rate to be set by the commissioner, sufficient to cover all reasonable expenses of the department associated with the visit, inspection, or examination provided for by this section. A state banking association or branch of an out-of-state state bank shall pay such assessment or fee within ten days of receiving a billing from the commissioner. Fees must be deposited in the financial institutions regulatory fund. The state treasurer shall report the payments of fees to the commissioner, and if any corporation or institution or branch is delinquent more than twenty days in making the payment, the board may make an order suspending the functions of the delinquent corporation or institution or branch until payment of the amount due. The commissioner may assess a penalty of five dollars a day additional for the delay. The state banking board may waive or postpone the collection of this special assessment if the assessment would place an undue burden on the state banking association or branch.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 110, § 2; 1989, ch. 96, § 4; 1995, ch. 79, § 5; 2001, ch. 88, § 10.

6-01-18.
Reports and examinations of institutions by federal deposit insurance corporation, other state supervisors, or federal reserve system.

The commissioner may accept, in lieu of any examination authorized or required by this title to be conducted by the department of any banking institution, the examination that may have been made of the institution within a reasonable period by the federal deposit insurance corporation, any other state supervisor, or the federal reserve system, if a copy of the examination is furnished to the commissioner. The commissioner also may accept any report relative to the condition of any banking institution which may have been obtained by that corporation or system within a reasonable period in lieu of any similar report that the commissioner is authorized by this title to require of the institution, if a copy of the report is furnished to the commissioner. The commissioner may furnish to the corporation or system, or to any official or examiner, a copy or copies of any or all examinations made of any banking institutions and of any or all reports made by them, and may give access to and disclose to the corporation or system, or any official or examiner, any and all information possessed by the office of the commissioner with reference to the conditions or affairs of any institution insured with the federal deposit insurance corporation. This section does not limit the duty of any banking institution in this state, the deposits of which are to any extent insured under the provisions of the federal Act creating the federal deposit insurance corporation, or of any amendment of or substitution for that Act, to comply with the provisions of that Act, its amendments or substitutions, or the requirements of the corporation relative to examinations and reports, nor limit the powers of the commissioner with reference to examinations and reports under this title.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 95, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 6-0118; S.L. 1979, ch. 122, § 1; 1995, ch. 79, § 6.

6-01-19.
Commissioner to keep bank record.

The commissioner shall keep a bank record wherein must be recorded the name and location of each bank in the state, its capitalization and changes thereof, its officers, its shareholders and addresses thereof, and its reserve agents, and changes of the same, and the commissioner shall keep in docket form such other proceedings as may have been had relative to such bank by the state banking board and by the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 41; R.C. 1905, § 4675; C.L. 1913, § 5190; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 6-0119.

6-01-20.
Bank of North Dakota entitled to records. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 80, § 2.

6-01-21.
State agencies — Examinations — Fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 117.

6-01-21.1.
County agencies — Examinations — Fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 376, § 63.

6-01-21.2.
Municipal agencies, park boards, school districts — Examinations — Fees — Alternative audits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 376, § 63.

6-01-21.3.
Examination of municipal agencies and school districts by order of governor or upon petition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 376, § 63.

6-01-21.4.
Examination in case of irregularity or embezzlement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 376, § 63.

6-01-22.
Examination of counties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 376, § 63.

6-01-23.
Examinations of county treasurers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 376, § 63.

6-01-24.
Supervision of records and fiscal affairs of counties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 376, § 63.

6-01-25.
Supervision of books and accounts of public institutions and private institutions with which state has dealings.

The commissioner shall assume and exercise constant supervision over the books and financial accounts of the several public offices and institutions which the commissioner is authorized to examine. The commissioner shall prescribe and enforce a correct and uniform method of keeping financial accounts in such offices and institutions, shall recommend a form for warrants or for order-checks which must conform so far as consistent with statutory and charter requirements to approved banking practice, in order to facilitate handling of such instruments by banks and other depositories, and shall instruct the proper officer of each of said institutions in the due performance of the officer’s duties concerning the same. The commissioner has authority to examine the books and accounts of all private institutions with which the state has any dealings so far only as the same relate to such dealings. If any public officer having control of any such office or institutions fails or refuses to comply with the directions of the commissioner, the commissioner shall report the facts to the governor and to the manager of the state bonding fund, and such refusal constitutes grounds for removal from office and cancellation of the bond of such officer.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 95, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 138; R.C. 1899, § 138; R.C. 1905, § 142; C.L. 1913, § 226; S.L. 1933, ch. 71, § 16; 1943, ch. 91, § 9; R.C. 1943, § 6-0125; S.L. 1955, ch. 98, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 6-0125; S.L. 1967, ch. 376, § 1.

Cross-References.

Audit of claims against state bonding fund, see § 26.1-21-13.

6-01-26.
Special state examiner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 376, § 63.

6-01-27.
Duty of state examiner on failures by officers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 376, § 63.

6-01-28.
Public and private officers to aid examiner — Examiner’s authority on investigation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 376, § 63.

6-01-29.
Obstructing or misleading examiner — Penalty.

Every person who, when required to do so, shall refuse or neglect to make any return or exhibit, or to make or give any information required by the examiner, or who willfully shall obstruct or mislead the examiner in the execution of the examiner’s duties, or who in any manner shall hinder a thorough examination by the examiner, shall be guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 95, §§ 7, 8; R.C. 1895, §§ 142, 143; R.C. 1899, §§ 142, 143; R.C. 1905, §§ 146, 147; C.L. 1913, §§ 230, 231; S.L. 1933, ch. 71, §§ 20, 21; R.C. 1943, § 6-0129; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 40.

6-01-30.
Reports of commissioner — Contents.

The commissioner shall report to the governor the result of the commissioner’s examination of any public office or state institution and also shall make a report on any particular matter connected therewith at any time when required to do so by the governor.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 95, § 9; R.C. 1895, § 144; R.C. 1899, § 144; R.C. 1905, § 148; C.L. 1913, § 232; S.L. 1933, ch. 71, § 22; 1943, ch. 91, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 6-0130.

6-01-31.
Certain accounts open for inspection.

Any person acquiring custody of, or receiving any funds for or on behalf of the state of North Dakota, or any of its political subdivisions, who places such funds in an account with any financial institution, banking association, or banking institution, or who commingles such funds with any private account, has waived all privilege of privacy or confidentiality on such accounts for the purposes of permitting an audit, examination, or inspection by the state auditor, commissioner of financial institutions, or the attorney general, as hereinafter provided.

Upon application and a reasonable showing by either the state auditor, the commissioner of financial institutions, or the attorney general that any account, private or otherwise, in any banking association, financial institution, or banking institution, contains funds belonging to the state of North Dakota or a political subdivision, whether or not commingled with private funds, the district court may issue its order making such accounts available for examination, audit, or inspection by the state auditor, the commissioner of financial institutions, or the attorney general. No financial institution, banking association, or banking institution is subject to damages for giving information on, or making such account available for inspection, audit, or examination pursuant to this section.

In addition to any other presumptions, any check, draft, or other comparable instrument is presumed to represent public funds of the state, or a political subdivision, as the case may be, if it is payable to a person identified as an official of the state or a political subdivision.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 67, § 1.

6-01-32.
Liability of bank officers and directors.

No claim or action seeking to recover money damages may be brought by the federal deposit insurance corporation, resolution trust corporation, or other federal banking regulatory agency against any director or officer, including any former director or officer, of any insured financial depository institution unless the claim or action arises out of the gross negligence, or willful or intentional misconduct of the officer or director during the term of office with the insured financial institution.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 81, § 1.